District of Columbia statutes.
22-3319

Placing obstructions on or displacement of railway tracks.

Whoever maliciously places an obstruction on or near the track of any steam or street railway, or displaces or injures anything appertaining to such track, with intent to endanger the passage of any locomotive or car, shall be imprisoned for not more than 10 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1327, ch. 854, § 846
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 303(m), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3119.
1973 Ed., § 22-3119.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 303(m) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.